District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.08

Compensation — Members of boards and commissions.

(a)

Each member of any board or commission who receives compensation or reimbursement of expenses on January 1, 1980, shall receive such rates of compensation or reimbursement of expenses as are provided in existing law, rule, regulation, or order, or in this chapter, except as may be modified from time to time by rules and regulations published pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(a-1)

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, members of boards and commissions shall not be compensated for time expended in the performance of official duties except as authorized by subsections (b), (c), (c-1), (c-2), and (c-3) of this section.

(b)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to establish by rule and regulation the rates of compensation or reimbursement of expenses for members of any board or commission, including any board or commission established after January 1, 1980. Any such rules and regulations proposed by the Mayor shall be transmitted to the Council of the District of Columbia for a 30-day (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days on which the Council of the District of Columbia is on recess) review period. Such rules and regulations shall become effective only if the Council of the District of Columbia does not adopt, within 30 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days on which the Council of the District of Columbia is on recess) from the date of the Mayor’s submission, a resolution disapproving such rules and regulations in whole or in part. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 1-604.05, rules and regulations published under this subsection shall be effective no earlier than 30 days after their publication in the District of Columbia Register.

(c)

Members of the following boards and commissions shall be entitled to compensation in the form of a salary as currently authorized by law:

(1)

Public Service Commission;

(2)

Contract Appeals Board;

(3)

Rental Housing Commission;

(4)

The Chairperson of the District of Columbia Taxicab Commission;

(5)

District of Columbia Board of Ethics and Government Accountability; and

(6)

Full-time members of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission.

(c-1)

Members of the following boards and commissions shall be entitled to compensation in the form of an hourly rate of pay as follows:

(1)

Board of Zoning Adjustment members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $25 for time spent in performance of duties at meetings, not to exceed $12,000 for each board member per year;

(2)

Office of Employee Appeals members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $25 for time spent in performance of duties at meetings, not to exceed $3,000 for each member per year;

(3)

District of Columbia Retirement Board Members shall be entitled to compensation as provided in § 1-711(c);

(4)

Police and Firefighters Retirement and Relief Board members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $25 for time spent in performance of duties at meetings, not to exceed $8,000 for each board member per year;

(5)

Public Employee Relations Board members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $25 for time spent in performance of duties at meetings, not to exceed $3,000 for each board member per year;

(6)

Zoning Commission members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $25 for time spent in performance of duties at meetings, not to exceed $12,000 for each commission member per year;

(7)

Historic Preservation Review Board members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $25 for time spent in performance of duties at meetings, not to exceed $3,000 for each board member per year;

(8)

Alcoholic Beverage Control Board members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $40 for time spent in performance of duties at meetings, not to exceed $18,000 for each board member per year;

(9)

Part-time members of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $50 for time spent in performance of duties at meetings;

(10)

District of Columbia Board of Elections members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $40 while actually in the service of the board, not to exceed the $12,500 for each member per year and $26,500 for the Chairman per year.

(c-2)

Members of the following boards and commissions shall be entitled to compensation in the form of stipend as follows:

(1)

Each Commissioner, other than the ex officio Commissioner and the Chairperson, of the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia Housing Authority shall be entitled to a stipend of $4,000 per year for their service on the board; the Chairperson shall be entitled to a stipend of $6,000 per year. Each Commissioner also shall be entitled to reimbursement of actual travel and other expenses reasonably related to attendance at board meetings and fulfillment of official duties. Stipends and reimbursements shall be made at least quarterly; provided, that all stipends shall be paid from non-District funds;

(2)

Each member of the Higher Education Licensure Commission shall be entitled to a stipend of $8,000 per year for their service on the commission. Each member also shall be entitled to reimbursement of actual travel and other expenses reasonably related to the performance of the duties of the commission while away from their homes or regular places of business; and

(3)

(A)

Public and industry members of the District of Columbia Taxicab Commission shall be entitled to compensation of $25 per meeting or work session, not to exceed $1,350 for each public or industry member per year.

(B)

Total compensation for all Commission members shall not exceed $10,800, for all meetings and work sessions.

(c-3)

Chairpersons of the boards and commissions specified in subsections (c-1) and (c-2) of this section who are public members shall be entitled to an additional compensation of 20% above the annual maximum.

(d)

Members of boards and commissions shall not be entitled to reimbursement for expenses unless specifically authorized by law; except, that transportation, parking, or mileage expenses incurred in the performance of official duties may be reimbursed, not to exceed $15 per meeting or currently authorized amounts, whichever is less.

(e)

The Mayor shall conduct a comprehensive study of the compensation and stipend levels of the District’s boards and commissions, recognizing the different characteristics of these entities, and examining the best practices in the compensation and stipend policies of surrounding and comparable jurisdictions. Based on this study, the Mayor shall provide a report to the Council by December 31, 2002, with recommendations for a rational compensation and stipend policy applicable to boards and commissions, including any recommendations for changes in specific compensation and stipend levels that could be addressed in the FY 2004 budget and financial plan.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1108, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(k), 27 DCR 2632
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 801(b), 42 DCR 3684
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 101, 44 DCR 7378
Nov. 29, 1999, 113 Stat. 1515, Pub. L. 106-113, § 119(b)
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38,§ 302, 46 DCR 6373
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 201, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, §§ 2403, 2502, 2603, 49 DCR 6968
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 102(b), 51 DCR 6525
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1212, 51 DCR 8441
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 5(b), 52 DCR 2638
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 120(b), 52 DCR 10637
Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-159, § 3, 53 DCR 5385
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-361, § 3, 56 DCR 1204
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-363, § 3(b), 58 DCR 963
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1132, 59 DCR 8025
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-198, § 2(b), 61 DCR 12450
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 241, 62 DCR 1884
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2202, 62 DCR 10905
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-74, § 3, 63 DCR 252

Cross References

Board of consumer claims arbitration, compensation, see § 50-503.
Board of elections and ethics, compensation, see § 1-1001.04.
Board of library trustees, compensation, see § 39-104.
Board of real property assessments and appeals, compensation, see § 47-825.01.
Board of veterinary examiners, compensation, see § 3-505.
Boxing and wrestling commission, member compensation, see § 3-604.
Education licensure commission, compensation, see § 38-1304.
Employee deferred compensation program, employee eligibility, treatment of benefits, authorization of program, see § 47-3601.
Health occupations, members of health occupation boards and advisory committees, compensation, see § 3-1204.06.
Law revision commission, compensation, see § 45-301.
Mayor’s authority to determine honorariums, “honorariums” defined, see § 1-321.01.
Occupational safety and health commission, compensation, see § 32-1106.
Public fund for drug prevention and children at risk, compensation, see § 47-4003.
Statewide health coordinating council, reimbursement of certain member expenses, see § 44-403.
Taxation, non-health related occupations and professions licensure, establishment of boards, compensation, see § 47-2853.09.
Taxicab commission, compensation, see § 50-305.
Tax revision commission, reimbursement of certain member expenses, see § 47-463.
Workers’ compensation insurance study commission, establishment, see § 32-1542.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-137.02, § 1-321.01, § 1-602.02, § 1-603.01, § 1-606.01, § 1-611.12, § 1-611.52, § 1-612.03, § 1-1001.04, § 1-1162.05, § 2-1404.03, § 3-604, § 3-1204.06, § 3-1442, § 32-1106, § 32-1542.01, § 38-827.02, § 38-1304, § 39-104, § 44-403, § 45-301, § 47-463, § 47-2853.09, § 47-3601, § 50-305, and § 50-503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-612.8.
1973 Ed., § 1-341.8.

Effect of Amendments

Public Law 106-113 rewrote subpar. (c)(2)(F), which previously read:
“Redevelopment Land Agency members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of $25 per meeting, not to exceed $1,200 for each member per year.”
D.C. Law 13-38, in subpars. (c)(2)(A) and (c)(2)(G), substituted “$6,000” for “$3,000”.
D.C. Law 13-298, in subpar. (c)(2)(I), substituted “$6,000” for “$2,500”.
D.C. Law 14-190, in subpars. (c)(2)(A) and (c)(2)(G), substituted “$12,000” for “$6,000”; in subpar. (c)(1)(E), substituted “Chairperson, and public and industry members” for “Chairperson”; added subpar. (c)(2)(K); and added subsec. (e).
D.C. Law 15-187, in subpar. (c)(2)(I), substituted “$12,000” for “$6,000”.
D.C. Law 15-205, in subpar. (H) of par. (2) of subsec. (c), substituted “3,000” for “1,800”.
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (c)(1)(E), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-91, in subpar. (c)((2)(I), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-159 repealed subsec. (c)(2)(E) which had read as follows: “(E) Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals members shall be entitled to compensation at the hourly rate of 25 per meeting.”
D.C. Law 17-361, in subsec. (c)(2)(I), substituted “$40” for “$25” and substituted “$15, 000” for “$12,000”.
D.C. Law 18-363, in subsec. (c)(2)(J), substituted “Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia” for “Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added (c)(2)(L).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-198 substituted “Police and Firefighters Retirement and Relief Board” for “Police and Firemen's Retirement and Relief Board” in (c)(2)(C).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 rewrote (c) and (d); and added (a-1), (c-1), (c-2), and (c-3).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36, in (c-2)(1), substituted “$ 4,000” for “$ 3,000,” substituted “$ 6,000” for “$ 5,000,” and added “provided, that all stipends shall be paid from non-District funds.”
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-74, in (c-2)(2), substituted “Higher Education Licensure Commission” for “Education Licensure Commission” and substituted “$8,000” for “$4,000.”

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 801 of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Real Property Tax Reassessment Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-207, April 9, 1994, law notification 44 DCR 2402).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 101 of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Real Property Tax Reassessment Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-125, June 10, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 5883).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Real Property Tax Reassessment and Cold Weather Eviction Temporary Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-1, May 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 5301).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-51, Jan. 9, 2016, 62 DCR 13983).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 101 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and § 101 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Real Property Tax Reassessment Congressional Adjournment Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-11, March 3, 1997, 44 DCR 1741), and see § 3 of the Real Property Tax Reassessment Second Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-244, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 652).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Real Property Tax Reassessment Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-293, February 27, 1998, 45 DCR 1758).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Real Property Tax Reassessment and Cold Weather Eviction Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-18, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2354).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 302 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2303, 2402, and 2503 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1212 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1212 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 241 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 241 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2202 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-158, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13715).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3 of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-284, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1188).

Short Title

Short title of title XXV of Law 14-190: Section 2501 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that title XXV of the act may be cited as the Boards and Commissions Compensation Study Amendment Act of 2002.

Short title of subtitle T of title I of Law 15-205: Section 1211 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle T of title I of the act may be cited as Historic Preservation Review Board Stipends Amendment Act of 2004.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.